Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 2. Bond Program for Fish Processors and Primary Fish Buyers.

Sec. 44.25.040.
Security for certain obligations.

A person applying for a license as a fish processor or primary fish buyer shall file with the commissioner of revenue a performance bond, conditioned upon the promise to pay the following:

wages owing to all persons employed by the fish processor or primary fish buyer, including contractual employee benefits;

independent registered commercial fishermen for the price of the raw fishery resource purchased from them;

fees owing for the service of transporting raw fish;

contributions imposed under AS 23.20 (Alaska Employment Security Act).

A fish processor or primary fish buyer that processes more than 30,000 pounds of fish a year or purchases more than $30,000 of fish a year shall file a performance bond with the commissioner in the amount specified in this subsection. The amount of the bond is $10,000 unless, during the five years preceding the application, one of the following has occurred:

a final judgment in excess of $10,000 was awarded against the bond required under this section; if the final judgment against the bond was in excess of $10,000 but less than $50,000, the amount of the bond is increased to a total of $50,000; if the final judgment against the bond was $50,000 or more, the amount of the bond is increased to a total of $100,000;

the commissioner has determined that the fish processor has engaged in the business of fish processor in the state or the primary fish buyer has engaged in the business of primary fish buyer in the state while not in compliance with this section and has not yet satisfied a final judgment entered against the fish processor or primary fish buyer for payment for labor furnished to, raw fishery resources purchased by, or raw fish transportation services provided to the fish processor or primary fish buyer; if the fish processor has engaged in the business of a fish processor or the primary fish buyer has engaged in the business of primary fish buyer while not in compliance with this section and has not yet satisfied a final judgment for payment for labor furnished to, raw fishery resources purchased by, or raw fish transportation services provided to the fish processor or primary fish buyer, the amount of the bond is increased to a total of $100,000; or

the commissioner has determined under (j) of this section that a claim against the bond filed by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development under (i) of this section met the requirements in (i) of this section; if the amount of the claim was in excess of $10,000 but was less than $50,000, the amount of the bond is increased to a total of $50,000; if the amount of the claim was $50,000 or more, the amount of the bond is increased to a total of $100,000; an increase in bond amount under this paragraph may not be imposed until 45 days after the commissioner determines under (j) of this section that the claim of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development met the requirements in (i) of this section.

A fish processor or primary fish buyer that processes 30,000 pounds or less of fish a year and purchases $30,000 or less of fish a year shall file a performance bond with the commissioner in the amount specified in this subsection. The amount of the bond is $2,000 unless, during the preceding five years, one of the following has occurred:

a final judgment in excess of $2,000 was awarded against the bond required under this section; if the final judgment against the bond was in excess of $2,000 but less than $10,000, the amount of the bond is increased to a total of $10,000; if the final judgment against the bond was $10,000 or more, the amount of the bond is increased to a total of $20,000;

the commissioner has determined that the fish processor has engaged in the business of fish processor in the state or that the primary fish buyer has engaged in the business of primary fish buyer in the state while not in compliance with this section and has not yet satisfied a final judgment entered against the fish processor or primary fish buyer for payment for labor furnished to, raw fishery resources purchased by, or raw fish transportation services provided to the fish processor or primary fish buyer; if the fish processor has engaged in the business of fish processor or primary fish buyer has engaged in the business of primary fish buyer while not in compliance with this section and has not yet satisfied a final judgment for payment for labor furnished to, raw fishery resources purchased by, or raw fish transportation services provided to the fish processor or primary fish buyer, the amount of the bond is increased to a total of $20,000; or

the commissioner has determined under (j) of this section that a claim against the bond filed by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development under (i) of this section met the requirements in (i) of this section; if the amount of the claim was in excess of $2,000 but was less than $10,000, the amount of the bond is increased to a total of $10,000; if the amount of the claim was $10,000 or more, the amount of the bond is increased to a total of $20,000; an increase in bond amount under this paragraph may not be imposed until 45 days after the commissioner determines under (j) of this section that the claim of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development met the requirements in (i) of this section.

If a fish processor who has filed a performance bond under (c) of this section processes more than 30,000 pounds of fish in a year or purchases more than $30,000 of fish in a year, the fish processor shall, within seven days after the day on which the 30,000 pound threshold or the $30,000 threshold is exceeded, notify the commissioner and comply with (b) of this section. If a fish processor who has filed a performance bond under (c) of this section processes more than 30,000 pounds of fish in a year or purchases more than $30,000 of fish in a year, and does not comply with (b) of this section within seven days after the date on which the 30,000 pound threshold or the $30,000 threshold is exceeded, the fish processor shall suspend processing fish until a bond has been filed under (b) of this section.

If a primary fish buyer who has filed a performance bond under (c) of this section purchases more than $30,000 of fish in a year, the primary fish buyer shall, within seven days after the day on which the $30,000 threshold is exceeded, notify the commissioner and comply with (b) of this section. If a primary fish buyer who has filed a performance bond under (c) of this section purchases more than $30,000 of fish in a year, and does not comply with (b) of this section within seven days after the date on which the $30,000 threshold is exceeded, the primary fish buyer shall suspend purchases of fish until a bond has been filed under (b) of this section.

A fish processor or primary fish buyer may use only a surety bond, cash deposit, or other negotiable security as a performance bond under this section. The surety must be satisfactory in the determination of the commissioner. The use of other negotiable security as a performance bond must be in a form acceptable to the commissioner. The commissioner shall waive the filing of a performance bond under this section if

the fish processor or primary fish buyer has more than $10,000 in lienable real property located in the state and provides proof of the property in a form satisfactory to the commissioner;

the fish processor or primary fish buyer is not required under (b) or (c) of this section to post a bond in excess of $10,000; and

within the five years preceding the application under AS

43.75.020

, an employee, fisherman, or contracted raw fish transporter has not obtained a final judgment against the fish processor’s or primary fish buyer’s bond under this section.

If an applicant for a license as a fish processor or primary fish buyer has complied with this section, the Department of Revenue may issue that applicant a license to engage in the business of fish processor or primary fish buyer.

A claim against a fish processor or primary fish buyer for failing to pay an employee for wages or contractual benefits owed, for failing to pay an independent registered fisherman for the price of raw fishery resource purchased from the fisherman, or for failing to pay an independent contractor for the transportation of raw fish may be brought upon the bond filed under this section in the superior court of the judicial district in which the work was done or in any judicial district in the state in which jurisdiction may be obtained. If an action is brought upon the bond, a copy of the complaint shall be served by registered or certified mail upon the commissioner at the time the suit is filed. The commissioner shall transmit a copy of the complaint and any judgment to the surety or holder of the negotiable security. If a judgment is entered against cash deposited with the commissioner, the commissioner, upon receipt of a certified copy of a final judgment, shall pay the judgment from the amount of the deposit. The commissioner shall maintain a record, available for public inspection, of all suits commenced under this subsection.

A claim against a fish processor or primary fish buyer for failing to pay contributions imposed under AS 23.20 may be brought by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development against the bond filed under this section by filing a claim against the bond with the commissioner, along with proof, satisfactory to the commissioner, that the fish processor or primary fish buyer

received a notice of assessment under AS

23.20.205

;

did not pay the amount specified in the notice of assessment within 30 days after receiving the notice of assessment or, if the assessment was contested under AS

23.20.220

, within 30 days after receiving the department’s final decision under AS

23.20.220

(c); and

did not file an appeal of the assessment under AS 23.20.220 or filed an appeal but did not initiate a proceeding for judicial review under AS

23.20.445

within 30 days after the department’s final decision under AS

23.20.220(c)

.

If the commissioner determines that the Department of Labor and Workforce Development has met the claim requirements in (i) of this section, the commissioner shall forward the claim and supporting documents to the surety or holder of the negotiable security. If the fish processor or primary fish buyer has deposited cash with the commissioner, the commissioner shall pay the claim of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development from the amount of the deposit. If the commissioner determines that the Department of Labor and Workforce Development has not met the claim requirements in (i) of this section, the commissioner shall provide the Department of Labor and Workforce Development with written notice of the deficiency of its claim.

If a performance bond is insufficient to satisfy all claims filed against it under this section, claims brought against the bond under (h) of this section have priority over a claim filed against the bond under (i) of this section. The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall return to the commissioner money received from a claim filed against a fish processor’s or primary fish buyer’s performance bond under (i) of this section if an employee, fisherman, or contracted raw fish transporter obtains a final judgment under (h) of this section against that fish processor’s or primary fish buyer’s bond and the

fish processor or primary fish buyer has not replenished the bond after it was used to cover the claim filed under (i) of this section; or

final judgment obtained by the employee, fisherman, or contracted raw fish transporter is more than the amount of the bond available under (b) or (c) of this section.

The term of a performance bond expires two years after the fish processor or primary fish buyer is no longer licensed in this state, except that if, during that two-year period, a claim has been asserted against the bond, the term of the bond is five years. If the surety on the bond wishes to cancel the bond, the surety may do so by giving the commissioner written notice of intention to cancel. The cancellation is effective 30 days after the notice is delivered to the commissioner.

History.

(E.O. No. 85 § 3 (1993); am §§ 1, 2 ch 46 SLA 1995; am § 4 ch 24 SLA 2005)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 24, SLA 2005 (SB 124), proposing the 2005 repeal and reenactment of this section, see 2005 Senate Journal 441 — 442.

Sec. 44.25.041.
Exemptions from bonding requirement.

A fish processor or primary fish buyer that does not purchase fish or hire employees is exempt from the bonding requirements of AS

44.25.040

.

Restaurants, grocery stores, and established fish markets are exempt from the bonding requirement of AS

44.25.040

.

History.

(E.O. No. 85 § 3 (1993))

Sec. 44.25.042.
Suspension and revocation of license.

If a final judgment impairs the liability of the surety upon the bond or depletes the cash deposits or other security so that there is not in effect the bond, undertaking, cash deposit, or other security in the full amount prescribed in AS

44.25.040

, the license of the fish processor or primary fish buyer shall be suspended until the liability in the required amount, unimpaired by unsatisfied judgment claims, has been furnished.

If a bonding company cancels its bond of a fish processor or primary fish buyer, the fish processor’s or primary fish buyer’s license shall be revoked. The fish processor or primary fish buyer may again obtain a license by complying with the requirements of AS

44.25.040

.

If a licensed fish processor or primary fish buyer fails to fulfill the obligations as set out in AS

44.25.040

, the license of the processor or buyer shall be suspended for a period of time the commissioner determines is appropriate. After three suspensions the license may be permanently revoked.

Proceedings to suspend or revoke a license are governed by AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

If the commissioner determines that a fish processor or primary fish buyer is acting in violation of AS

44.25.040

, the commissioner shall give written notice prohibiting further action by the person as a fish processor or primary fish buyer. The prohibition continues until the person has submitted evidence acceptable to the commissioner showing that the violation has been corrected.

A person affected by an order issued under AS

44.25.040

and this section may seek equitable relief preventing the commissioner from enforcing the order.

In an action instituted in the superior court by the commissioner or a representative of the commissioner, a person acting in the capacity of a fish processor or primary fish buyer in violation of AS

44.25.040

may be enjoined from acting as a fish processor or primary fish buyer.

If the commissioner determines under AS

44.25.040(j)

that a claim filed under AS

44.25.040

(i) is sufficient to allow collection against the performance bond filed under AS

44.25.040

, the fish processor’s or primary fish buyer’s license shall be suspended until the amount of the claim under AS

44.25.040(i)

is paid in full and the performance bond is replenished.

History.

(E.O. No. 85 § 3 (1993); am § 5 ch 24 SLA 2005)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 24, SLA 2005 (SB 124), adding (h) of this section, see 2005 Senate Journal 441 — 442.

Sec. 44.25.045.
Penalty for failure to obtain bond.

A person who is required to obtain the bond required by AS

44.25.040

and who fails to obtain that bond is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. Each day a violation occurs constitutes a separate offense.

History.

(E.O. No. 85 § 3 (1993))

Sec. 44.25.047.
Regulations.

The commissioner may adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of AS

44.25.040

—

44.25.048

.

History.

(E.O. No. 85 § 3 (1993))

Sec. 44.25.048.
Definitions for surety bond program.

In AS

44.25.040

—

44.25.048

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of revenue;

“established fish market” means a market maintained in a permanent structure exclusively for the sale of seafood to the public at retail;

“fish” means any species of aquatic finfish, invertebrates and amphibians, shellfish, or any other raw fishery resource, in any stage of its life cycle, found in or introduced into the state, and includes fish eggs except fish eggs sold for stock enhancement purposes;

“fish processor” means a person engaging or attempting to engage in a business for which a license is required under AS 43.75;

“grocery store” means a store maintained for the sale of food products exclusively to the public at retail;

“primary fish buyer” means a person, other than a cooperative corporation organized under AS 10.15, engaging or attempting to engage in the business of originally purchasing or buying any fishery resource in intrastate, interstate, or foreign commerce;

“restaurant” includes a place maintained for the sale and on-premise consumption of food, and a street vendor who sells food prepared for immediate consumption.

History.

(E.O. No. 85 § 3 (1993))